Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 5. AlaskAdvantage Loan Program.

Sec. 14.43.161.
Purpose; creation.

There is established the AlaskAdvantage loan program to provide postsecondary educational financial assistance through the federal guaranteed student loan program. The AlaskAdvantage loan program is the primary source for financial aid to eligible borrowers under this chapter.

History.

(§ 29 ch 85 SLA 2001; am § 10 ch 63 SLA 2004)

Sec. 14.43.162.
Eligibility.

For a borrower to be eligible for a loan under AS

14.43.161

—

14.43.168

, the borrower must meet the eligibility requirements established by the federal guaranteed student loan program and must be

a resident of the state as determined under (b) of this section; or

physically present in this state and attending an institution that is physically located in this state.

To meet the residency requirement of (a) of this section, the borrower

must physically reside in this state and maintain a domicile in this state during the 12 consecutive months before the date of application for the program, except that the borrower may be absent from this state for not more than a total of 60 days during that 12-month period; and

may not have

declared or established residency in another state; or

received residency or a benefit based on residency from another state.

To continue to meet the residency requirement of (a) of this section for each year that a loan is received or subsequently applied for, the borrower must meet the requirements of (b) of this section, except for

full-time attendance at an educational or training institution;

military service; or

demonstrated good cause as determined by the commission.

History.

(§ 29 ch 85 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For AlaskAdvantage federal consolidation loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 2.

For AlaskAdvantage loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 3.

Sec. 14.43.163.
Restrictions on award.

Under AS

14.43.161

—

14.43.168

, the commission may make loans subject to the following restrictions:

a loan amount awarded may not exceed the maximum amount for the school year as established by the federal guaranteed student loan program;

a borrower may not be awarded a loan amount that would, when aggregated with other loans awarded to the student under the federal guaranteed student loan program, exceed the maximum total amount allowable for each borrower that is established by the federal guaranteed student loan program;

the loan award may not exceed the total cost of attendance at the postsecondary institution less other forms of financial aid awarded to the borrower to pay for those costs.

History.

(§ 29 ch 85 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For AlaskAdvantage federal consolidation loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 2.

For AlaskAdvantage loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 3.

Sec. 14.43.164.
Use of loan.

A borrower may use a loan under AS

14.43.161

—

14.43.168

only for postsecondary education and reasonably related purposes as authorized by the federal guaranteed student loan program.

History.

(§ 29 ch 85 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For AlaskAdvantage federal consolidation loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 2.

For AlaskAdvantage loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 3.

For supplemental education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 9.

Sec. 14.43.165.
Interest.

The corporation shall set the rate of interest on a loan made under AS

14.43.161

—

14.43.168

in accordance with federal and state law. Interest on a loan made under AS 14.43.l61 —

14.43.168

may not exceed the rate specified by the applicable provisions of the federal guaranteed student loan program. Interest on a loan made under AS

14.43.161

— 14.43.168 accrues from the time that the loan is disbursed.

A borrower may elect to make payments of interest that is payable during the borrower’s term of attendance at the postsecondary institution or during certain deferment periods authorized by the commission; however, the commission shall capitalize any unpaid interest as part of the principal to be repaid as agreed, or upon graduation, withdrawal, or completion of the deferment period.

Notwithstanding the provisions of (b) of this section, if a borrower qualifies for a subsidized loan under the federal guaranteed student loan program, the interest on the loan is paid by the federal government during the borrower’s term of attendance and any qualifying deferment and grace periods authorized under the loan.

History.

(§ 29 ch 85 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For AlaskAdvantage federal consolidation loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 2.

For AlaskAdvantage loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 3.

Sec. 14.43.166.
Repayment of loans.

A borrower’s obligation to commence repayment of the principal and interest on a loan under AS

14.43.161

—

14.43.166

and

14.43.168

begins six months after the borrower’s completion or other termination of the postsecondary education program. The commission may accelerate the repayment of any loan made in error or in reliance upon a false statement made by the borrower. The commission shall determine the period over which loans are repaid; however, the maximum period of repayment of loans may not exceed the maximum period permitted under applicable provisions of the federal guaranteed student loan program.

History.

(§ 29 ch 85 SLA 2001; am § 11 ch 63 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For AlaskAdvantage federal consolidation loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 2.

For AlaskAdvantage loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 3.

Sec. 14.43.167.
Consolidation of loans.

The commission may offer

an eligible borrower who has received more than one loan under the federal guaranteed student loan program the option of consolidating the multiple loans into a single loan; or

to consolidate loans made to married borrowers if the married borrowers agree to be jointly and severally liable for repayment of the consolidated loan, regardless of the borrowers’ future marital status or the death of one of the borrowers.

History.

(§ 29 ch 85 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For AlaskAdvantage federal consolidation loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 2.

Sec. 14.43.168.
Default.

The commission shall establish the default requirements for loans made under AS

14.43.161

—

14.43.168

; however, the requirements may not be less restrictive than those established by the federal guaranteed student loan program.

The provisions of AS

14.43.145

—

14.43.155

apply to loans under AS

14.43.161

—

14.43.168

that are in default.

History.

(§ 29 ch 85 SLA 2001; am § 12 ch 63 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For AlaskAdvantage loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 3.

For supplemental education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 9.